District of Columbia statutes.
39-107

Purchase, rent, and sale of library-related items; use of profits.

The Board shall have power to purchase, rent, and sell library-related items, including, but not limited to, the following: film catalogs and other publications of the library; publications and items of special interest commemorating individuals and events connected with the library; unneeded books; video recordings; reproductions of unique library materials; and promotional items and souvenirs such as book tote bags, pens, notebooks, and postcards. Any profits realized or proceeds collected shall be deposited into the Library Collections Account, established by § 39-114.

History

June 3, 1896, ch. 315, § 7
as added Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-38, § 2, 28 DCR 3389
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-55, § 2, 30 DCR 6284
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9053, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4022(a), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4052(a), 60 DCR 12472

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 37-106.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21 substituted “or proceeds collected shall be deposited into the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “shall be used to purchase books and other publications”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “Books and Other Library Materials Account, established by § 39-114” for “unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” in the second sentence.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “into the Library Collections Account, established by § 39-114” for “into the Books and Other Library Materials Account, established by § 39-114” in the last sentence.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 101(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section by striking the phrase “Books and Other Library Materials” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “Library Collections” in its place.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4022(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4022(a) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 4051 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “Library Collections Account Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.